th: อาวุธฟันดาบที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: Buhurt/HMB; ดาบเอเป้; ดาบฟอยล์; HEMA; ดาบยาว; อาวุธหลายประเภท; ดาบเรเปียร์; SCA; ดาบเซเบอร์; อาวุธสามประเภท; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
de: Kompatible Fechtwaffe: Buhurt/HMB; Degen; Florett; HEMA; Langschwert; Multi-Waffe; Rapier; SCA; Säbel; Drei-Waffen; Universal; Sonstige
sl-SI: Združljivo orožje za sabljanje: Buhurt/HMB; Meč; Floret; HEMA; Dolgi meč; Več orožij; Rapir; SCA; Sablja; Tri orožja; Univerzalno; Drugo
pt-PT: Arma de esgrima compatível: Buhurt/HMB; Espada; Florete; HEMA; Espada longa; Arma múltipla; Rapieira; SCA; Sabre; Três armas; Universal; Outra
vi: Vũ khí đấu kiếm tương thích: Buhurt/HMB; Kiếm ba cạnh (Épée); Kiếm liễu (Foil); HEMA; Kiếm trường (Longsword); Đa vũ khí; Kiếm Rapier; SCA; Kiếm chém (Sabre); Ba vũ khí; Đa năng; Khác
en: Compatible fencing weapon: Buhurt/HMB; Epee; Foil; HEMA; Longsword; Multi-weapon; Rapier; SCA; Sabre; Three-weapon; Universal; Other
zh-CN: 适配击剑武器: Buhurt/HMB; 重剑; 花剑; HEMA; 长剑; 多武器; 刺剑; SCA; 佩剑; 三种武器; 通用; 其他
fi: Yhteensopiva miekkailuase: Buhurt/HMB; Kalpa; Floretti; HEMA; Pitkämiekka; Moniasetyyppi; Rapiiri; SCA; Säilä; Kolmiase; Universaali; Muu
bg-BG: Съвместимо оръжие за фехтовка: Бухурт/HMB; Шпага; Рапира; HEMA; Дълъг меч; За различни оръжия; Рапира (историческа); SCA; Сабя; За три оръжия; Универсално; Друго
hr-HR: Kompatibilno oružje za mačevanje: Buhurt/HMB; Mač; Floret; HEMA; Dugi mač; Više oružja; Rapir; SCA; Sablja; Tri oružja; Univerzalno; Ostalo
sv: Kompatibelt fäktningsvapen: Buhurt/HMB; Värja; Florett; HEMA; Långsvärd; Multivapen; Rapir; SCA; Sabel; Trevapen; Universellt; Annat
ja: 互換性のあるフェンシング武器: Buhurt/HMB; エペ; フルーレ; HEMA; ロングソード; マルチウェポン; レイピア; SCA; サーブル; スリーウェポン; 汎用; その他
nl: Compatibel schermwapen: Bohurt/HMB; Degen; Floret; HEMA; Langzwaard; Meerdere wapens; Rapier; SCA; Sabel; Drie wapens; Universeel; Overig
sk-SK: Kompatibilná šermiarska zbraň: Buhurt/HMB; Kord; Fleret; HEMA; Dlhý meč; Viac zbraní; Rapír; SCA; Šabľa; Tri zbrane; Univerzálna; Iné
ko: 호환 펜싱 종목: 부후르트/HMB; 에페; 플뢰레; HEMA; 롱소드; 다용도 무기; 레이피어; SCA; 사브르; 3종 무기; 범용; 기타
da: Kompatibelt fægtevåben: Buhurt/HMB; Kårde; Fleuret; HEMA; Langsværd; Multivåben; Rapir; SCA; Sabel; Tre våben; Universal; Andet
zh-TW: 相容的擊劍劍種: Buhurt/HMB; 銳劍; 鈍劍; HEMA; 長劍; 多種武器; 刺劍; SCA; 軍刀; 三種武器; 通用; 其他
tr: Uyumlu eskrim silahı: Buhurt/HMB; Epe; Flöre; HEMA; Uzun kılıç; Çoklu silah; Meç; SCA; Kılıç; Üçlü silah; Evrensel; Diğer
el: Συμβατό όπλο ξιφασκίας: Buhurt/HMB; Épée; Ξίφος ασκήσεως; HEMA; Μακρύ σπαθί; Πολλαπλών όπλων; Ραπιέρα; SCA; Σπάθη; Τριών όπλων; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
es: Arma de esgrima compatible: Buhurt/HMB; Espada; Florete; HEMA; Espada larga; Multiarma; Estoque; SCA; Sable; Tres armas; Universal; Otra
lt-LT: Suderinamas fechtavimo ginklas: Buhurtas / HMB; Špaga; Floretė; HEMA; Ilgasis kalavijas; Keli ginklai; Rapyra; SCA; Kardas; Trys ginklai; Universalus; Kita
pl: Kompatybilna broń szermiercza: Buhurt/HMB; Szpada; Floret; HEMA; Długi miecz; Wiele broni; Rapier; SCA; Szabla; Trzy bronie; Uniwersalna; Inne
ru: Совместимое оружие для фехтования: Бугурт/ИСБ; Шпага; Спортивная рапира; HEMA; Длинный меч; Мультиоружие; Рапира; SCA; Сабля; Три вида оружия (шпага, рапира, сабля); Универсальное; Другое
pt-BR: Arma de esgrima compatível: Buhurt/HMB; Espada; Florete; HEMA; Espada longa; Multiarma; Rapieira; SCA; Sabre; Três armas; Universal; Outro
hu: Kompatibilis vívófegyver: Buhurt/HMB; Párbajtőr; Tőr; HEMA; Hosszúkard; Többféle fegyver; Rapír; SCA; Kard; Három fegyver; Univerzális; Egyéb
it: arma da scherma compatibile: Buhurt/HMB; Spada; Fioretto; HEMA; Spada lunga; Multiarma; Striscia; SCA; Sciabola; Tre armi; Universale; Altro
ro-RO: Armă de scrimă compatibilă: Buhurt/HMB; Spadă; Floretă; HEMA; Sabie lungă; Multi-armă; Rapieră; SCA; Sabie; Trei arme; Universal; Altele
cs: Kompatibilní šermířská zbraň: Buhurt/HMB; Kord; Fleret; HEMA; Dlouhý meč; Pro více zbraní; Rapír; SCA; Šavle; Pro tři zbraně; Univerzální; Jiné
fr: Arme d’escrime compatible: Béhourd / HMB; Épée; Fleuret; AMHE; Épée longue; Armes multiples; Rapière; SCA; Sabre; Trois armes; Universel; Autre
nb: Kompatibelt fektevåpen: Buhurt/HMB; Kårde; Florett; HEMA; Langsverd; Flervåpen; Rapiér; SCA; Sabel; Trevåpen; Universell; Annet